Utah statutes.
41-6a-1301.   Standards and specifications for lighting and special warning devices on school buses.

(1) (a)  A school bus shall be equipped with red signal lamps mounted as high and as widely spaced laterally as practicable.

(b)  The red signal lamps shall display two alternately flashing red lights, located at the same level, to the front and rear of the school bus.

(c)  The red signal lamps shall be visible at 500 feet in normal sunlight.

(2) (a)  A school bus shall be equipped with yellow signal lamps mounted near each of the four red signal lamps and at the same level but closer to the vertical centerline of the bus.

(b)  The yellow signal lamps shall display two alternately flashing yellow lights to the front and rear of the school bus.

(c)  The yellow signal lamps shall be visible at 500 feet in normal sunlight.

(3)  A school bus driver shall activate the yellow signal lamps at least 100 feet, but not more than 500 feet, before every stop at which the alternately flashing red lights are activated.

